vi: Loại lưu trữ tích hợp: Tủ sách; Tủ kết hợp; Ngăn kéo; Không có; Kệ; Ngăn kéo cầu thang; Ngăn kéo gầm giường; Tủ quần áo hoặc tủ đứng; Khác
zh-CN: 内置收纳类型: 书架; 组合; 抽屉; 无; 置物架; 楼梯抽屉; 床下抽屉; 衣橱或橱柜; 其他
sk-SK: Typ vstavaného úložného priestoru: Knižnica; Kombinácia; Zásuvky; Žiadne; Police; Zásuvky v schodoch; Zásuvky pod posteľou; Skriňa alebo skrinka; Iné
zh-TW: 內建儲存類型: 書櫃; 組合; 抽屜; 無; 層架; 樓梯抽屜; 床底抽屜; 衣櫥或櫥櫃; 其他
nl: Ingebouwde opslag type: Boekenkast; Combinatie; Lades; Geen; Planken; Traplades; Onderbedlades; Kledingkast of kast; Overig
de: Integrierter Stauraum: Bücherregal; Kombination; Schubladen; Keine; Regale; Treppenschubladen; Unterbettschubladen; Kleiderschrank oder Schrank; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tipo de armazenamento integrado: Estante de livros; Combinado; Gavetas; Nenhum; Prateleiras; Gavetas na escada; Gavetas embaixo da cama; Guarda-roupa ou armário; Outros
it: Tipo di archiviazione integrato: Libreria; Combinazione; Cassetti; Nessuno; Mensole; Cassetti per scale; Cassetti sottoletto; Guardaroba o armadio; Altro
pl: Typ wbudowanego przechowywania: Regał na książki; Mieszane; Szuflady; Brak; Półki; Szuflady w schodkach; Szuflady pod łóżkiem; Szafa lub szafka; Inne
hu: Beépített tároló típusa: Könyvespolc; Kombinált; Fiókok; Nincs; Polcok; Lépcsőfiókok; Ágy alatti fiókok; Szekrény; Egyéb
tr: Yerleşik depolama tipi: Kitaplık; Kombinasyon; Çekmeceler; Yok; Raflar; Merdiven altı çekmeceler; Yatak altı çekmeceler; Gardırop veya dolap; Diğer
th: ประเภทของที่เก็บของแบบบิวท์อิน: ชั้นวางหนังสือ; แบบผสม; ลิ้นชัก; ไม่มี; ชั้นวาง; ลิ้นชักบันได; ลิ้นชักใต้เตียง; ตู้เสื้อผ้าหรือตู้เก็บของ; อื่นๆ
da: Type af indbygget opbevaring: Reol; Kombination; Skuffer; Ingen; Hylder; Trappeskuffer; Skuffer under sengen; Garderobe eller skab; Andet
ru: Тип встроенной системы хранения: Книжный шкаф; Комбинированное; Выдвижные ящики; Нет; Полки; Ящики в ступенях; Подкроватные ящики; Платяной шкаф или шкафчик; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de armazenamento integrado: Estante; Combinação; Gavetas; Nenhum; Prateleiras; Gavetas de escada; Gavetas debaixo da cama; Roupeiro ou armário; Outro
es: Tipo de almacenamiento incorporado: Estantería para libros; Combinación; Cajones; Ninguno; Estantes; Cajones en escalera; Cajones debajo de la cama; Armario o gabinete; Otro
nb: Innebygd lagringstype: Bokhylle; Kombinasjon; Skuffer; Ingen; Hyller; Trappeskuffer; Skuffer under sengen; Garderobe eller skap; Annet
en: Built-in storage type: Bookcase; Combination; Drawers; None; Shelves; Stair drawers; Under-bed drawers; Wardrobe or cabinet; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta ugrađene memorije: Polica za knjige; Kombinacija; Ladice; Nema; Police; Ladice u stepenicama; Ladice ispod kreveta; Ormar ili ormarić; Ostalo
cs: Typ vestavěného úložného prostoru: Knihovna; Kombinace; Zásuvky; Žádné; Police; Zásuvky ve schodech; Zásuvky pod postel; Šatní skříň nebo skříňka; Jiné
ja: 内蔵ストレージタイプ: 本棚; コンビネーション; 引き出し; なし; 棚; 階段下引き出し; ベッド下引き出し; ワードローブまたはキャビネット; その他
lt-LT: Integruotos laikymo vietos tipas: Knygų lentyna; Kombinuota; Stalčiai; Nėra; Lentynos; Stalčiai laiptuose; Stalčiai po lova; Spinta arba spintelė; Kitas
ro-RO: Tip de depozitare încorporat: Bibliotecă; Combinație; Sertare; Fără; Rafturi; Sertare de scară; Sertare sub pat; Dulap de haine sau cabinet; Altele
fi: Sisäänrakennettu säilytystilatyypit: Kirjahylly; Yhdistelmä; Vetolaatikot; Ei mitään; Hyllyt; Porraslaatikot; Sängynaluslaatikot; Vaatekaappi tai kaappi; Muu
fr: Type de rangement intégré: Bibliothèque; Combinaison; Tiroirs; Aucun; Étagères; Tiroirs d’escalier; Tiroirs sous le lit; Armoire ou meuble; Autre
sv: Inbyggd förvaringstyp: Bokhylla; Kombination; Lådor; Ingen; Hyllor; Trapplådor; Sänglådor; Garderob eller skåp; Övrigt
el: Τύπος ενσωματωμένης αποθήκευσης: Βιβλιοθήκη; Συνδυασμός; Συρτάρια; Κανένα; Ράφια; Συρτάρια στα σκαλοπάτια; Συρτάρια κάτω από το κρεβάτι; Ντουλάπα ή ντουλάπι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta vgrajenega shranjevanja: Knjižna omara; Kombinirano; Predali; Brez; Police; Predali v stopnicah; Predali pod posteljo; Garderobna omara ali omarica; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип вградено съхранение: Библиотека; Комбинация; Чекмеджета; Няма; Рафтове; Чекмеджета в стълбите; Чекмеджета под леглото; Гардероб или шкаф; Друго
ko: 내장 수납 유형: 책장; 조합형; 서랍; 없음; 선반; 계단 서랍; 침대 밑 서랍; 옷장 또는 수납장; 기타